Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1186
Department; duties.

A program for the collection for recycling and sale of state government recyclable material shall be designed and implemented by the Department of Administrative Services in all state-operated buildings.

Laws 1986, LB 380, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-1140.03;

Laws 1990, LB 987, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 81-1645;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 97;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 39.